tests/verbs.yaml
 "Verb hambburuuc":
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : hambburuucaasi
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><intr><prf> : hambburuucabeikkinaa
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><prf> : hambburuucabeikke
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p1><sing><imfr> : hambburuucays
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><opt> : hambburuuca
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><imfr> : hambburuucaasa
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><prf> : hambburuucabeakka
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><intr><prf> : hambburuucabeikkii
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><prf> : hambburuucadasa
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><intr><prf> : hambburuucadii
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><imfr> : hambburuucakka
    hambburuuc<v><tv><p2><sing><intr><imfr> : hambburuucay
